District of Columbia statutes.
35-213

Repealed

Free transportation of uniformed policemen and firemen.

Repealed.

Sept. 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 683, ch. 433
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 46, 36 DCR 492
1981 Ed., § 44-213.
1973 Ed., § 44-213.